Wyoming statutes. Title 7 Criminal Procedure
Article 5. Verdict and Sentence

Cross references. —

As to procedure relating to verdict, sentence and judgment, see Rules 31 and 32, W.R. Cr. P.

Judge may deny or grant credit for time served in presentence custody

where the presentence custody is not due to the defendant's indigency, and the sum of the time spent in presentence custody plus the sentence does not exceed the maximum allowable sentence. Jones v. State, 602 P.2d 378,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 482

(Wyo. 1979).

Standard on appellate review of sentencing procedure. —

The sentencing judge is given wide discretion in determining the length and conditions of the term of imprisonment to be imposed upon conviction and such determination, if within the statutory limits, will not be disturbed absent a clear abuse of discretion. Jones v. State, 602 P.2d 378,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 482

(Wyo. 1979).

Stay of execution by supreme court. —

Error of the court in a capital case in refusing to suspend execution of sentence, on defendant's application and notice of intention to appeal, was without prejudice where the execution was stayed on application to the supreme court. Keffer v. State, 12 Wyo. 49, 73 P. 556,

1903 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1903).

Defendant was allowed to be released on bail pending appeal of conviction,

contrary to the claim that former §§

7-11-507

and 7-11-511 were superseded pursuant to Rule 46.2, W.R.Cr.P. Once §§

7-11-507

and 7-11-511 were recognized as providing a substantive right to bail pending appeal, then Rule 3.1, W.R. Cr. P provided the procedure for setting bail and admitting the convicted person to bail as required by statute. State v. District Court, 715 P.2d 191,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 501

(Wyo. 1986).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

21A Am. Jur. 2d Criminal Law §§ 791 to 975; 76 Am. Jur. 2d Trial §§ 1750 to 1927.

What constitutes former “conviction” within statute enhancing penalty of second or subsequent offense, 5 ALR2d 1080.

Necessity and sufficiency of proof of identity for purposes of statute as to enhanced punishment in case of prior conviction, 11 ALR2d 870.

Necessity of notice of application or intention to correct error in judgment entry in criminal cases, 14 ALR2d 224.

Determination of character of former crime as a felony, so as to warrant punishment of an accused as a second offender, 19 ALR2d 227.

Duty of court, upon plea of guilty or nolo contendere to offense involving several degrees, to hear evidence to determine degree, 34 ALR2d 919.

Nunc pro tunc correction or amendment of sentence, giving accused benefit of time previously served, 35 ALR2d 1283.

Sentences by different courts as concurrent, 57 ALR2d 1410.

Right to pass sentence or judgment on person convicted of conspiracy before it is certain that another of those charged will be convicted, 91 ALR2d 700.

Right of court in imposing sentence to consider other offenses committed by defendant in absence of statute in that regard, 96 ALR2d 768.

Necessity and sufficiency of interrogation of defendant as to whether he has anything to say why sentence should not be pronounced against him, and effect of failure to make inquiry, 96 ALR2d 1292.

Right of defendant in state court to bail pending appeal from conviction — modern cases, 28 ALR4th 227.

Bail: duration of surety's liability on posttrial bail bond, 32 ALR4th 575.

Relief available for violation of right to counsel at sentencing in state criminal trial, 65 ALR4th 183.

Chronological or procedural sequence of former convictions as affecting enhancement of penalty under habitual offender statutes, 7 ALR5th 263.

Use of prior military conviction to establish repeat offender status, 11 ALR5th 218.

What constitutes unusually “vulnerable” victim under sentencing guideline § 3A1.1 permitting increase in offense level, 114 ALR Fed 355.

Construction and application of § 2Q1.2 and § 2Q1.3 of United States Sentencing Guidelines (18 USCS Appx. §§ 2Q1.3 and 2Q1.3), pertaining to offenses involving hazardous or toxic substances, or other environmental pollutants, 138 ALR Fed 507.

23A C.J.S. Criminal Law §§ 1395 to 1592; 89 C.J.S. Trial §§ 818 to 841, 843, 845.

§ 7-11-501.
Return of verdict; poll of jury.

In all criminal cases the verdict shall be unanimous. It shall be returned by the jury to the judge in open court. Before the verdict is accepted and recorded, the jury shall be polled at the request of any party or upon the court’s own motion. If upon the poll there is not unanimous concurrence, the jury may be directed to retire for further deliberations or may be discharged.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 14, § 155; R.S. 1887, § 3316; R.S. 1899, § 5387; C.S. 1910, § 6251; C.S. 1920, § 7548; R.S. 1931, § 33-1003; C.S. 1945, § 10-1401; W.S. 1957, § 7-266; Laws 1985, ch. 147, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to procedure in regard to return of verdict and poll of jury, see Rule 31(a), (d), W.R. Cr. P.

Editor's notes. —

Most of the following annotations are taken from cases decided under prior law.

Test of value of stolen property

is the value at the time and place where they are taken. Buckles v. State, 622 P.2d 934,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 279

(Wyo. 1981).

But failure to ascertain value does not void conviction; where

grade of offense is not dependent on value of property taken, e.g., embezzlement. Hatheway v. State, 623 P.2d 741,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 284

(Wyo. 1981); Buckles v. State, 622 P.2d 934,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 279

(Wyo. 1981).

But order of restitution cannot be enforced. —

In those instances in which the statute provides that restitution may be made a part of the court's sentence, any requirement of restitution should be set aside if the value is not found in the jury's verdict. Hatheway v. State, 623 P.2d 741,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 284

(Wyo. 1981).

When specific finding of value not required. —

Where the value of the property was not in dispute at the trial and the trial court specifically considered that element of the offense, there was no error in the failure of the trial court to specifically find the value of the property taken. Fitzgerald v. State, 599 P.2d 572,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 444

(Wyo. 1979).

When failure to note property value not reversible error. —

In a conviction for petit larceny, there is no absence of fundamental fairness in the procedural irregularity of failing to note the value of stolen property on the verdict, where the evidence shows that without a doubt the petitioner stole gasoline, which has money value. Munoz v. Maschner, 590 P.2d 1352,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 375

(Wyo. 1979).

But not using wrong sign and omitting “dollars.” —

Omission of dollar sign and word “dollars” in a verdict in a prosecution for larceny, and placing before the figures the sign signifying number, did not render verdict indefinite. Richey v. State, 28 Wyo. 117, 201 P. 154,

1921 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 1921), reh'g denied, 28 Wyo. 117, 205 P. 304,

1922 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1922).

Verdict finding defendant guilty of receiving stolen property need not state value

of property. State v. Le Masters, 36 Wyo. 241, 254 P. 120,

1927 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 1927).

Grand larceny verdict need only state stolen goods valued over$100. —

A verdict form in a conviction for grand larceny need only state that personal goods worth over $100 were stolen. Weathers v. State, 652 P.2d 970,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 394

(Wyo. 1982).

Defendant to be informed of verdict. —

Failure of court, before pronouncing sentence of death in a capital case, to inform defendant of the verdict and ask whether he had anything to say why judgment should not be pronounced against him, was without prejudice where, on its attention being called to the omission, court recalled defendant, informed him of the verdict and propounded statutory interrogatory. Keffer v. State, 12 Wyo. 49, 73 P. 556,

1903 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1903).

Cited

in

Harris v. State, 933 P.2d 1114,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 48

(Wyo. 1997).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Voluntary absence of accused when sentence is pronounced, 6 ALR2d 997.

Absence of accused at return of verdict in felony case, 23 ALR2d 456.

Record showing presence of accused at return of verdict in felony case, 23 ALR2d 456.

Right of accused to be present at polling of jury, 49 ALR2d 619.

Relief available for violation of right to counsel at sentencing in state criminal trial, 65 ALR4th 183.

Requirement of jury unanimity as to mode of committing crime under statute setting forth the various modes by which offense may be committed, 75 ALR4th 91.

Criminal law: Propriety of reassembling jury to amend, correct, clarify, or otherwise change verdict after jury has been discharged, or has reached or sealed its verdict and separated, 14 ALR5th 89.

Propriety of reassembling jury to amend, correct, clarify, or otherwise change verdict after discharge or separation at conclusion of civil case, 19 ALR5th 622.

§ 7-11-502.
Conviction of necessary included offense or attempt.

In any criminal case the defendant may be found guilty of an offense necessarily included in the offense charged or of an attempt to commit either the offense charged or an offense necessarily included therein.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 14, § 157; R.S. 1887, § 3318; R.S. 1899, § 5389; C.S. 1910, § 6253; C.S. 1920, § 7550; R.S. 1931, § 33-1005; C.S. 1945, § 10-1403; W.S. 1957, § 7-268; W.S. 1977, §

7-11-503

; Laws 1985, ch. 147, § 2; 1987, ch. 157, § 4.

Cross references. —

As to attempt, see §

6-1-301

.

As to procedure in regard to conviction of lesser offense, see Rule 31(c), W.R. Cr. P.

When instruction on lesser offense improper. —

Where evidence shows that defendant is either guilty as charged in the indictment or information or is not guilty at all, or where there is no evidence of a minor or lesser degree of the offense, instruction as to such lesser offense is neither necessary nor proper. State v. Gonzales, 46 Wyo. 52, 23 P.2d 354,

1933 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(Wyo. 1933).

In a case involving second-degree sexual assault, a trial court did not err by denying a request for lesser-included jury instructions for third-degree sexual assault or sexual battery under the circumstances of the case due to the fact that different elements were required.
Heywood v. State, 2007 WY 149, 170 P.3d 1227,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 168

(Wyo. 2007).

Effect of general verdict. —

General verdict of “guilty as charged in the indictment” convicted defendant of the highest degree of murder, notwithstanding fact that he might have been found guilty of lower degrees under the same indictment. Cook v. Territory, 3 Wyo. 110, 4 P. 887,

1884 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 1884).

Verdict of manslaughter under indictment for murder. —

This section contains the only express authority for a verdict of manslaughter under an indictment for murder in the first degree. Brantley v. State, 9 Wyo. 102, 61 P. 139,

1900 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo. 1900); State v. Parmely, 65 Wyo. 215, 199 P.2d 112,

1948 Wyo. LEXIS 24

(Wyo. 1948).

Conviction of aggravated assault and battery sustained. —

See Elliott v. State, 47 Wyo. 36, 30 P.2d 791,

1931 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(Wyo. 1931).

Applied

in

State v. Woodward, 69 Wyo. 262, 240 P.2d 1157,

1952 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(1952).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “The Lesser Included Offense Instruction — Problems with Its Use,” see III Land & Water L. Rev. 587 (1968).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Lesser-related state offense instructions: modern status, 50 ALR4th 1081.

When should jury's deliberation proceed from charged offense to lesser included offense, 26 ALR5th 603.

Propriety of lesser included offense jury charge in prosecution of federal tax crime defendant, 102 ALR Fed 128.

Propriety of lesser included offense charge to jury in federal assault prosecution, 103 ALR Fed 880.

Propriety of lesser included offense charge to jury in federal prosecution for crime involving property rights, 105 ALR Fed 669.

Propriety of lesser included offense charge in federal prosecution of narcotics defendant, 106 ALR Fed 236.

§ 7-11-503.
Execution of jail sentence.

When any person convicted of an offense is sentenced to imprisonment in the county jail, the court shall order the defendant into the custody of the sheriff, who shall deliver him, together with the record of conviction, to the jailor, in whose custody he shall remain in the jail of the proper county, until the term of his confinement expires, or he is pardoned or otherwise legally discharged.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 14, § 168; R.S. 1887, § 3329; R.S. 1899, § 5198; C.S. 1910, § 6035; C.S. 1920, § 7332; R.S. 1931, § 32-108; C.S. 1945, § 10-1414; W.S. 1957, § 7-279; W.S. 1977, § 7-11-514; Laws 1985, ch. 147, § 2; 1987, ch. 157, § 4.

Cross references. —

As to fine as part of punishment for felony, see §

6-10-102

.

As to commitment for nonpayment of fine or costs, see §

6-10-105

.

§ 7-11-504.
Commitment until fine and costs paid.

If a defendant sentenced to pay a fine or costs defaults in payment, the court may order the defendant to show cause why he should not be committed to jail. If the court finds that the defendant’s default is willful or is due to a failure on defendant’s part to make a good faith effort to obtain the funds required for the payment and the court determines that the defendant has an ability to pay or that a reasonable probability exists that the defendant will have an ability to pay, the court may order him committed until the fine or costs, or a specified part thereof, is paid. The defendant shall be given a credit for each day of imprisonment at the rate provided by W.S.

6-10-105

, and may earn additional credits against his fine or costs for work performed as provided by W.S.

7-16-101

through

7-16-104

.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 35, § 155; R.S. 1887, § 1063; R.S. 1899, § 5195; C.S. 1910, § 6033; C.S. 1920, § 7330; R.S. 1931, § 32-109; C.S. 1945, § 10-1415; W.S. 1957, § 7-280; W.S. 1977, § 7-11-515; Laws 1985, ch. 147, § 2; 1987, ch. 157, § 4; 2011, ch. 129, § 101.

Cross references. —

As to compensation to prisoners, see §

7-16-203

.

As to imprisonment for debt, see art. 1, § 5, Wyo. Const.

As to working prisoners convicted for violation of municipal ordinances, see §

5-6-211

.

As to commitment for refusal to pay fine or costs, see §

6-10-105

.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, inserted “and the court determines that the defendant has an ability to pay or that a reasonable probability exists that the defendant will have an ability to pay.”

Application to indigent unconstitutional. —

This section and §§

5-6-211

,

6-10-105

and 7-16-128 (now repealed) are unconstitutional as applied to an indigent person who lacks the means to pay a fine; however, imprisonment is not precluded as an enforcement method when alternative means are unsuccessful despite the defendant's reasonable efforts to satisfy the fines by those means. Whiteplume v. City of Riverton, Civ. No. C81-068K (D. Wyo. 1981).

Defendant convicted of contempt may be committed until fine is paid.

Fisher v. McDaniel, 9 Wyo. 457, 64 P. 1056,

1901 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(Wyo. 1901).

Commitment until fine paid not indeterminate sentence. —

Sentence for contempt, that offender be imprisoned for 6 months and pay fine of $500.00, ordering offender into custody of sheriff and to stand committed until fine is paid and sentence served, is not indeterminate, since statute fixes rate at which such sentence as to fine is to be executed by imprisonment. Fisher v. McDaniel, 9 Wyo. 457, 64 P. 1056,

1901 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(Wyo. 1901).

Commitment for nonpayment where both fine and imprisonmentimposed. —

A defendant upon whom both a jail sentence and a fine are imposed may be committed for the nonpayment of the fine. Fisher v. McDaniel, 9 Wyo. 457, 64 P. 1056,

1901 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(Wyo. 1901).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Indigency of offender as affecting validity of imprisonment as alternative to payment of fine, 31 ALR3d 926.

§ 7-11-505.
Payment of costs of prosecution.

Payment of the costs of prosecution may be added to and made a part of the sentence in any felony or misdemeanor case if the court determines that the defendant has an ability to pay or that a reasonable probability exists that the defendant will have an ability to pay.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 15, § 1; R.S. 1887, § 1061; R.S. 1899, § 5193; C.S. 1910, § 6031; C.S. 1920, § 7328; R.S. 1931, § 32-106; C.S. 1945, § 10-1416; W.S. 1957, § 7-281; W.S. 1977, § 7-11-516; Laws 1985, ch. 147, § 2; 1987, ch 126, § 1; ch. 157, § 4; 1991, ch. 155, § 1; ch. 167, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to fine for felony generally, see §

6-10-102

.

As to penalties for misdemeanors generally, see §

6-10-103

.

Institutional costs not authorized. —

Statutes such as this one, imposing liability for prosecution costs, are constitutional as long as they are not construed to authorize assessment of institutional costs. King v. State, 780 P.2d 943,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 202

(Wyo. 1989); Seaton v. State, 811 P.2d 276,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 79

(Wyo. 1991).

Ex post facto assessment of costs unconstitutional. —

Because the assessment of costs against a defendant convicted prior to the effective date of this section would be a substantive detriment, such costs could not be assessed without violating the constitutional ex post facto prohibition. Loomer v. State, 768 P.2d 1042,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 35

(Wyo. 1989), limited, Snyder v. State, 912 P.2d 1127,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 37

(Wyo. 1996).

Jury and bailiff expenses may not be taxed as costs of prosecution

against the convicted defendant. The right to trial by jury in criminal prosecutions must be kept inviolate. Johnson v. State, 532 P.2d 598,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 134

(Wyo. 1975).

The phrase “costs of prosecution” does not include the mileage and per diem paid to all jurors on the jury panel or on the trial jury, nor does it include the amounts paid for the services of the court bailiffs, and the taxation of such items against defendants in a criminal prosecution is erroneous. Arnold v. State, 76 Wyo. 445, 306 P.2d 368,

1957 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(Wyo. 1957).

But court has discretion in assessing costs of witness feesand transportation. —

The trial judge did not abuse his discretion in assessing costs of witness fees and witness transportation, which are authorized expenses of prosecution. The drunken driver and other convicted persons must share some of the expenses of establishing guilt, as the trial judge in his sense of fairness sees it. Johnson v. State, 532 P.2d 598,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 134

(Wyo. 1975).

Trial court did not abuse its discretion in ordering defendant to pay for witnesses' actual travel costs and for their meals and lodging pursuant to this section. Bruckner v. State, 972 P.2d 141,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(Wyo. 1999).

Trial court erred in manner in which it imposed costs of prosecution

as part of the defendant's sentence, where the prosecution offered no evidence to establish the costs of prosecution and, when the costs appeared in the written judgment and sentence five days after the sentencing hearing, they appeared as a lump sum with no identification or itemization of specific costs. Juarez v. State, 791 P.2d 287,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(Wyo. 1990).

Assessment of witness fees was inappropriate. —

Trial court erred in ordering defendant to pay witness fees and costs as part of a sentence for the misdemeanor offense of interference with a peace officer because the gravamen of the interference with a peace officer crime was supported principally by the police officer who was the subject of defendant's resistance.
Harris v. State, 2011 WY 70, 250 P.3d 163,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 73

(Wyo. 2011).

Inappropriate for defendant to pay costs. —

See Van Riper v. State, 882 P.2d 230,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 108

(Wyo. 1994).

Quoted

in

Burke v. State, 746 P.2d 852,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 550

(Wyo. 1987); Davis v. State, 859 P.2d 89,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 144

(Wyo. 1993).

Cited

in

Kaess v. State, 748 P.2d 698,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 553

(Wyo. 1987).

§ 7-11-506.
Trial transcript for indigent prisoner upon appeal.

Any person sentenced to imprisonment in a state penal institution, who appeals to the supreme court, may file, in the court in which that person was convicted, a petition requesting that the person be furnished with a stenographic transcript of the proceedings at that person’s trial. The petition shall be verified by the petitioner and shall state facts showing that at the time of conviction and at the time of filing the petition that person was without financial means to pay for the transcript. If the judge who imposed sentence, or any other judge of the court, finds that the defendant is without financial means with which to obtain the transcript of the proceedings at trial, the judge shall order the reporter to transcribe an original and copy of the reporter’s notes. The original of the transcript shall be filed with the clerk and the copy shall be delivered to the defendant without charge. The reporter’s fees for preparation of the transcript shall be the same as those prescribed in W.S.

5-3-410

, and shall be paid by the county in which the conviction is had.

History.

Laws 1961, ch. 65, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 282.1; W.S. 1977, § 7-11-518; Laws 1985, ch. 147, § 2; 1987, ch. 157, § 4; 1992, ch. 25, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to Wyoming State penitentiary, see §

25-1-201

.

Section is inapplicable to post-conviction relief proceedings.

Escobedo v. State, 601 P.2d 1028,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 499

(Wyo. 1979).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Determination of indigency of accused entitling him to transcript for purposes of appeal, 66 ALR3d 954.

§ 7-11-507.
Advisement of loss of firearms rights upon conviction.

No judgment of conviction shall be entered upon a plea of guilty or nolo contendere to any charge which may result in the disqualification of the defendant to possess firearms pursuant to the provisions of 18 U.S.C. §§ 922(g)(1), (9) and 924(a)(2) or other federal law unless the defendant was advised in open court by the judge:

Of the collateral consequences that may arise from that conviction pursuant to the provisions of 18 U.S.C. §§ 921(a)(33), 922(g)(1), (9) and 924(a)(2); and

That if the defendant is a peace officer, member of the armed forces, hunting guide, security guard or engaged in any other profession or occupation requiring the carrying or possession of a firearm, that he may now, or in the future, lose the right to engage in that profession or occupation should he be convicted.

History.

Laws 2009, ch. 19, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2009, ch. 19, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 24, 2009.

Sufficient advisements. —

Review of illegal sentence. —

Failure to advise. —

Construction. —

Sufficient advisements. —

In a no contest
plea, defendant waived his right to appeal his claim that the district
court did not properly advise him that his future employment opportunities
could be affected by loss of the privilege to possess firearms because
his plea waiver did not include any objection to the sufficiency
of
the firearms advisements; defendant repeatedly stated that he
had
read and understood the terms of the plea agreement, which included
the firearm consequences of his plea; and there were no assertions
that the district court relied on race or any other improper factor,
that defendant received ineffective assistance of counsel in the
negotiation
of the plea agreement, or that his sentence exceeded
the statutory
maximum. Henry v. State, 2015 WY 156, 362 P.3d 785,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 173

(Wyo. 2015).

In a no contest
plea, district court's firearms advisement was sufficient because,
although the district court did not advise defendant word for word
from the statute and the advisement was a bit confusing because it
referred to the employment consequences of his convictions before
telling him of the possibility of losing the firearm privilege, prior
to the change of plea hearing, defendant had been advised of the
firearms
consequences of his convictions in the plea agreement, which
he stated
he had read and understood; and common sense would have
told him that
the employment consequences referred to by the district
court at the
change of plea hearing could be associated with his
loss of firearms
privileges. Henry v. State, 2015 WY 156, 362 P.3d 785,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 173

(Wyo. 2015).

Review of illegal sentence. —

Appellate court could not review defendant's claim that the judgment and sentence entered after he pleaded guilty were illegal under this section due to the fact that he was not advised that his guilty pleas could result in the disqualification of his right to possess firearms pursuant to federal law because he raised it for the first time on appeal; moreover, even if the claim had been raised before the district court, it would have been barred by res judicata because the claim could have been raised on direct appeal and in defendant's petition for post-conviction relief.
Lunden v. State, 2013 WY 35, 297 P.3d 121,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 39

(Wyo. 2013).

Failure to advise. —

Trial court erred in entering a judgment of conviction for third-degree
sexual abuse of a minor upon defendant's guilty plea without advising
defendant in open court that the felony conviction could result in
the loss of the right to possess firearms and ammunition and to engage
in a profession or occupation requiring the carrying or possession
of a firearm.
Starrett v. State, 2012 WY 133, 286 P.3d 1033,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 139

(Wyo. 2012).

District court erred in failing to advise defendant of the potential loss of his firearms rights because this section does not create an advisement exception when a defendant may already be disqualified from owning or possessing firearms due to prior felony convictions. Balderson v. State, 2013 WY 107, 309 P.3d 809,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 112

(Wyo. 2013).

Construction. —

Word “shall” in the statute intimates an absence of discretion.
Starrett v. State, 2012 WY 133, 286 P.3d 1033,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 139

(Wyo. 2012).

Quoted

in

Russell v. State, 2013 WY 137, 312 P.3d 76,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 143

(Oct 31, 2013).